Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 57.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-157
Activities not constituting transacting
business.

(RULLCA
803) (a) Activities of a foreign limited liability company which do not constitute
transacting business in this state within the meaning of sections 21-155 to
21-163 include:

(1) maintaining, defending,
or settling an action or proceeding;

(2) carrying on any activity concerning its internal
affairs, including holding meetings of its members or managers;

(3) maintaining accounts
in financial institutions;

(4) maintaining offices or agencies for the transfer,
exchange, and registration of the company's own securities or maintaining
trustees or depositories with respect to those securities;

(5) selling through independent
contractors;

(6)
soliciting or obtaining orders, whether by mail or electronic means or through
employees or agents or otherwise, if the orders require acceptance outside
this state before they become contracts;

(7) creating or acquiring indebtedness, mortgages,
or security interests in real or personal property;

(8) securing or collecting debts
or enforcing mortgages or other security interests in property securing the
debts and holding, protecting, or maintaining property so acquired;

(9) conducting an isolated
transaction that is completed within thirty days and is not in the course
of similar transactions; and

(10) transacting business in interstate commerce.

(b) For purposes of sections
21-155 to 21-163, the ownership in this state of income-producing real property
or tangible personal property, other than property excluded under subsection
(a) of this section, constitutes transacting business in this state.

(c) This section does
not apply in determining the contacts or activities that may subject a foreign
limited liability company to service of process, taxation, or regulation under
law of this state other than the Nebraska Uniform Limited Liability Company
Act.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 57.